Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-139] Aiding the enemy. Any
person subject to this chapter who:

(1) Aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms,
ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

(2) Without proper authority, knowingly harbors or
protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds
any intercourse with the enemy, either directly or indirectly;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next